Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 1 DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
26.5-1-111. Data system - collection - analysis - cross-agency agreements.

The department shall work with local coordinating organizations, state agencies, local and tribal agencies, and providers, as necessary, to collect, share, manage, and protect qualitative and quantitative data pertaining to early childhood and family support programs and services. The department shall review and analyze the collected data to assess:

The needs of children and families for early childhood and family support programs;

The local and statewide availability, capacity, use, and quality of, and funding support for, early childhood and family support programs and services;

The degree to which the department and local and tribal agencies are reducing inequities in access to and use of early childhood and family support programs and services and in childhood outcomes;

The capacity, quality, training, education, employment status, and retention of and compensation provided to members of the workforce that serves early care and education, early childhood programs and services, and family support programs and services;

Long-term outcomes for children served by early childhood and family support programs and services, including correlations to school readiness as assessed pursuant to section 22-7-1004 (2), to academic success in third grade, and to high school graduation; and

Other measures that indicate the effectiveness of the early childhood and family support programs and services in Colorado in serving and supporting children, families, providers, and the early childhood workforce.

At a minimum, the department shall collect data pertaining to early childhood and family support programs and services that includes:

The number of children in the state who are eligible to receive, and the number of children who actually receive, services through the programs administered by the department; the demographics of said children, including socioeconomic status, race, ethnicity, language, and disability; and said children's eligibility for funding and use of early childhood and family support programs and services;

Information concerning groups of children who have historically encountered barriers to school readiness;

Information that enables the department, local coordinating organizations, and local and tribal agencies to assess on a continuing basis the needs for early childhood and family support programs and services in an area and make decisions concerning the provision of programs and services;

The demand for early childhood and family support programs and services and the existence of providers in areas throughout the state, including information concerning program capacity, such as the number of available classrooms; the local and statewide availability of locally, state-, and federally funded enrollment positions and vacancies in those positions; and the number of hours of services received by individual children and parents in programs;

The number of early childhood programs at each quality level statewide and in specific areas and the number and demographics of children served in early childhood programs at each quality level;

Data regarding the early childhood workforce; and

The combination and coordination of local, state, and federal funding for children and families to provide early childhood and family support programs and services and the programs and services that are provided, including use of more than one program or service by a single family.

The departments of early childhood, human services, education, public health and environment, and health care policy and financing shall enter into agreements to ensure data privacy and security with regard to shared early childhood data. In collecting and sharing data, the departments shall coordinate and require collection of data in ways that impose the least possible burden on families and providers, including by reducing redundancies in data collection across programs.

The department shall use information derived through the early childhood data system to, at a minimum, inform planning, leverage resource allocations, maximize children's access to early childhood programs and services, and support data-informed decision-making.

The department shall identify and pursue research opportunities to provide information to support new measures for improving the system of early childhood and family support programs and services in the state and to understand the causal effects of early childhood and family support programs and services that are provided.

The department, through the department website, shall regularly inform members of the early childhood community and other members of the public of progress made in improving the delivery, quality, access, availability, and capacity of early childhood programs and services. Specifically, the department shall provide information concerning the achievement of benchmarks in such areas as increasing the number of children receiving early childhood programs and services, improving preschool classroom quality, meeting program quality standards, and improving school readiness, and shall provide information concerning the results of preschool program evaluations completed pursuant to section 26.5-4-207.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 578, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-112. Transition review - program review - report - repeal.

The department shall enter into an agreement with a public or private entity to act as an independent evaluator of the department's performance in executing the functions identified in section 26.5-1-109 and in operating programs and providing services associated with those functions in accordance with this title 26.5. The independent evaluator shall complete a review of the operations of the department and the programs that transition from the department of human services and the department of education to the department. At a minimum, in conducting the review, the independent evaluator shall evaluate and make recommendations concerning:

Whether the department operates the programs and provides the services efficiently and ensures that the programs and services are:

Child, family, and community centered and serve the whole child and whole family;

Equity driven;

Focused on and accountable for achieving identified outcomes and making data-driven, outcome-based decisions;

Meeting high-quality standards;

Serving and supporting the early childhood workforce;

Supporting a mixed delivery system of school- and community-based preschool programs and supporting child care providers; and

Coordinated with other supports and services for families that are not operated by the department, including food assistance, cash assistance, and health care;

The effectiveness and efficiency of the governance structure and organization of the department, including whether to create a type 1 policy board within the department to be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and transfer rule-making authority and oversight of the department from the executive director to the policy board;

The cross-agency agreements with other departments that operate early childhood and family support programs and services and the effectiveness of the agreements in seamlessly providing said programs and services;

The impact of the implementation of the Colorado universal preschool program pursuant to part 2 of article 4 of this title 26.5 on the number of children served by the Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to part 1 of article 4 of this title 26.5. The independent evaluator shall evaluate this issue in consultation with county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103.

Whether the programs that the department operates were appropriate for transition or would be better operated in another department pursuant to a cross-agency agreement.

The independent evaluator, in coordination with the departments of education, human services, public health and environment, and health care policy and financing, shall review the programs and services pertaining to early childhood that were not transferred to the department, including the federal law and regulations pertaining to those programs and services, to determine whether the programs and services should be transferred to and operated by the department.

No later than November 1, 2025, the independent evaluator shall submit a report concerning the review of operations pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section and the review of the transfer of additional programs and services pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section to the department; the governor; the early childhood leadership commission; the public and behavioral health and human services committee and the education committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees; and the health and human services committee and the education committee of the senate, or any successor committees.

In conducting the reviews and making recommendations pursuant to this subsection (1), the independent evaluator shall solicit input through a process that includes participation by the populations served by the programs; the providers and members of the workforce working in the programs; local coordinating organizations; state, local, and tribal agencies involved in implementing the programs; and any other relevant experts.

The department, in collaboration with the departments of education, higher education, human services, public health and environment, and health care policy and financing, shall prepare an annual report concerning the progress made and challenges encountered by the department of early childhood in transitioning and implementing programs and providing services and by the departments as a group in implementing cross-agency collaboration related to, at a minimum:

Administration of part C of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended, and coordination with the department of education of the transition of children from part C to part B as agreed to in the interagency operating agreement described in section 26.5-3-404 (3) between the department and the department of education;

Implementation of the memorandum of understanding described in section 26.5-4-206 between the department and the department of education concerning administration of special education services for children prior to kindergarten, specifically implementation of part B, section 619, and part C of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended;

Administration of the child and adult care food program in collaboration with programs administered by the department;

Administration of the supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children in collaboration with programs administered by the department;

Operation of early childhood and family support programs and services that the department administers, including at a minimum, data concerning the children and families served and the use, availability, and capacity of programs throughout the state;

Interaction of early childhood care, learning, and supports with the public kindergarten and elementary education system to ensure children enter kindergarten ready to learn and are behaviorally and academically successful;

Alignment of the operation of early childhood programs and services with the child welfare system operated by the department of human services and local agencies; and

The use of public funding to support child care.

The department shall submit the report prepared pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section as part of the presentation made to a joint committee of reference pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2, in the 2023 regular legislative session and annually thereafter. In addition, the department shall annually submit the report to the governor; the early childhood leadership commission; the public and behavioral health and human services committee and the education committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees; and the health and human services committee and the education committee of the senate, or any successor committees. Notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to submit the report described in this subsection (2) continues until repealed pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section.

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective September 1, 2028.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 580, § 2, effective April 25.

26.5-1-113. Children's mental health program - appropriation - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Neurobiological research confirms that stressful experiences early in life can have profound and destructive impacts on the architecture of the brain;

Additional scientific research has shown, however, that responsive, nurturing relationships between young children and their caregivers that lead to secure attachment serve as powerful, protective buffers to stressful experiences early in life;

Providing an evidence-based, two-generation, and home-based prevention and early intervention mental health program can prevent or ameliorate the damage caused by stressful experiences; and

It is possible to decrease the stress experienced by families by connecting family members to needed services through intensive care coordination. By providing psychotherapy to a caregiver and child together, it is possible to repair the impact of stress on the child and strengthen the caregiving relationship.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that:

Given the harmful consequences of the economic disruptions resulting from and exacerbated by the COVID-19 public health emergency, it is in the best interest of the state to authorize the department of early childhood to contract with a nonprofit entity to provide evidence-based, two-generation, and home-based prevention and early intervention children's mental health programs; and

The purpose of children's mental health programs is to enhance the mental health and development of caregivers and young children. Children's mental health programs must combine comprehensive, coordinated services and psychotherapeutic intervention for caregivers and children, increase adult self-regulation and executive functioning, and result in long-term positive outcomes for children and families.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department and a nonprofit entity work collaboratively to share information as necessary to promote efficient and effective implementation of the children's mental health programs in Colorado.

The general assembly further finds and declares that contracting with a nonprofit entity to provide children's mental health programs constitutes critical government services.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Children's mental health program" means an evidence-based, two-generation, and home-based prevention and early intervention program for families with children from prenatal to six years of age who are experiencing chronic stress and trauma. A children's mental health program must be proven to significantly improve child emotional and behavioral health, child language development, and caregiver mental health, as well as decrease child abuse and neglect, resulting in long-term positive outcomes for children and families.

"Entity" means a Colorado-based nonprofit organization.

On or before November 1, 2022, the department shall contract with a Colorado-based nonprofit entity to provide children's mental health programs. The entity must have previous and current experience serving the target demographic using a curriculum that:

Includes components that provide for intervening with families with young children who are experiencing chronic stress and trauma. The curriculum must connect the families to needed services through intensive care coordination while also providing psychotherapy for the child and parent or guardian.

Has been previously implemented with success by providers in Colorado.

The entity with which the department contracts shall:

Perform community implementation readiness assessments and provide training, coaching, and monitoring for the implementation of children's mental health programs;

Provide ongoing quality assessments and improvement recommendations to ensure high-quality implementation and sustainability of children's mental health programs;

Provide the department with site-specific and statewide process and outcome evaluations of children's mental health programs; and

Annually prepare and submit to the department and the behavioral health administration an evaluation of the outcomes of all of the children's mental health programs implemented.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate two million dollars to the department for the purposes of implementing this section from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228. The department is authorized to expend up to five percent to pay the costs incurred in implementing this section, including the costs incurred in contracting with a nonprofit entity.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (4) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The department must either spend or obligate such appropriation in accordance with section 24-75-226 (4)(d).

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

The department and the contracted entity shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1369), ch. 346, p. 2470, § 1, effective June 3; (4)(b) amended, (HB 22-1411), ch. 271, p. 1960, § 18, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Section 24(1)(i) of chapter 271 (HB 22-1411), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1369 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1411 or HB 22-1369, whichever is later. HB 22-1411 became law and took effect May 27, 2022, and HB 22-1369 took effect June 3, 2022.